District of Columbia statutes.
3-1205.23

Suspension of license, registration, or certification during incarceration for felony or misdemeanor conviction.

A board may suspend the license, registration, or certification of a person during any time that the person is incarcerated after conviction of a felony or misdemeanor, regardless of whether the conviction has been appealed. A board, immediately upon receipt of a certified copy of a record of a criminal conviction, shall notify the person in writing at that person’s address of record with the board, and at the facility in which the person is incarcerated, of the suspension and that the person has a right to request a hearing. If requested, the hearing shall be held within 6 months of the release of the licensee, registrant, or person certified.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 523
as added July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(e)(21), 56 DCR 4043

Cross References

Licensing of health professionals, general qualifications of applicants, see § 3-1205.03.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(e)(21) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).
For temporary addition of D.C. Law 6-99, § 524, concerning Council approval of massage therapy regulations directed at licensed therapist facilities, see § 502 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).